Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1965.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Part III of Title 35 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 41COMMUNITY PARAMEDICINE SERVICESSubchapterA. Preliminary ProvisionsB. Community Paramedicine ServicesC. Financial ProvisionsSUBCHAPTER APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSec.4101. Definitions.12345678910111213141516171819 § 4101. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Community paramedicine provider." An individual who is certified as an EMS provider with additional training under 28 Pa. Code Pt. VII (relating to emergency medical services) and who has successfully completed an education program for community paramedicine health care as prescribed by the department by regulation. A community paramedicine provider shall also be considered a "community health worker" for purposes under 42 U.S.C. § 280g-11 (relating to awards to support community health workers and community health)."Community paramedicine services." Services, provided by certified EMS providers acting within their scope of practice under 28 Pa. Code Pt. VII, to provide outreach, injury and illness prevention and assistance, based on local need, to patients who do not require emergency medical transportation."Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Emergency medical services agency medical director" or "EMS agency medical director." As defined in section 8103 (relating to definitions)."Emergency medical services provider" or "EMS provider." As defined in section 8103."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) An individual or group health insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan that provides medical or health care coverage by any health care facility or licensed health care provider that is offered by or is governed under the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), 20250HB1965PN2479 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, or any of the following:(i) Subarticle (f) of Article IV of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(iii) A nonprofit corporation subject to 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(2) The term includes a Medicare supplement policy."Physician." As defined in section 8103.SUBCHAPTER BCOMMUNITY PARAMEDICINE SERVICESSec.4111. Certification.4112. Status.4113. Regulations.§ 4111. Certification. An individual who is certified for any of the types of EMS providers enumerated under section 8113(a) (relating to emergency medical services providers) shall be permitted to provide community paramedicine services, subject to disciplinary action under section 8121 (relating to certification sanctions).§ 4112. Status. A community paramedicine provider shall be deemed an emergency medical services provider for purposes of Chapter 81 (relating to emergency medical services system).20250HB1965PN2479 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 4113. Regulations. Within one year of the effective date of this section, the department shall promulgate regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter. The regulations shall establish certification, practice, disciplinary and other standards consistent with the purposes of this chapter and with the requirements applicable to EMS providers, except as necessary to meet the need for community paramedicine providers.SUBCHAPTER CFINANCIAL PROVISIONSSec.4121. Casualty insurance coverage.4122. Medical assistance reimbursement.§ 4121. Casualty insurance coverage. (a) Coverage.--A health insurance policy delivered, issued, executed or renewed in this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this section shall provide coverage for community paramedicine services.(b) Copayments, coinsurance and deductible amounts.--Coverage under this chapter shall remain subject to any copayment, coinsurance or deductible amounts provided for in the policy.(c) Prerequisites for coverage.--To qualify for coverage under this chapter, community paramedicine services must be part of a care plan ordered by an EMS agency medical director, primary health care provider or health insurer as follows:(1) The care plan should ensure that community paramedicine services provided by a community paramedicine provider are coordinated with other community resources where available.20250HB1965PN2479 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) Community paramedicine services shall not duplicate services already provided to the patient.(3) Community paramedicine services shall include the following:(i) Coordination of community services.(ii) Health assessment.(iii) Chronic disease monitoring and education.(iv) Medication compliance.(v) Hospital discharge follow-up care.(vi) Minor medical procedures ordered by an emergency medical services agency medical director or primary health care provider.(vii) Such other services as approved by regulation of the department.(d) Duty of Department of Human Services.--The Department of Human Services shall seek such waivers or Federal approvals as may be necessary to ensure that actions taken under this section comply with applicable Federal law.(e) Nonapplicability.--This section shall not apply to the following types of policies:(1) Limited benefit.(2) Credit.(3) Dental.(4) Vision.(5) Long-term care or disability income.§ 4122. Medical assistance reimbursement. (a) Duty of Secretary of Human Services.--The Secretary of Human Services shall, in consultation with the department and representatives of emergency medical services providers, physicians and local public health agencies, determine specified 20250HB1965PN2479 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 services and payment rates for community paramedicine services performed by community paramedicine providers under this chapter that are to be covered by medical assistance under the laws of this Commonwealth.(b) Payment.--(1) Payment for community paramedicine services under this chapter must be part of a care plan ordered by a primary health care provider or emergency medical services agency medical director of an ambulance service and must be billed by an eligible provider enrolled in medical assistance that employs or contracts with the community paramedicine provider.(2) In determining the community paramedicine services to include under medical assistance coverage, the Secretary of Human Services shall consider the potential of hospital admittance, emergency room utilization deductions, need for social services and increased access to quality care.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1965PN2479 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718